California, session 20252026, AB2647.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. In enacting this act, it is the intent of the Legislature to ensure the use of a skilled and trained workforce, as defined for purposes of Sections 25536.7 and 25536.8 of the Health and Safety Code, which is required to perform work on other dangerous industrial facilities, including petroleum refineries and chemical manufacturing facilities, also applies to the initial construction and maintenance of any new advanced nuclear reactors that may be permitted and constructed in the future, following the enactment of this act and amendments to Sections 25524.1 and 25524.2 of the Public Resources Code, to ensure public health and safety.SEC. 2. Section 25302.2 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:25302.2. (a) On or before July 1, 2027, January 1, 2028, as part of the integrated energy policy report or as a separate report, as determined by the commission, the commission shall prepare a comprehensive assessment of the potential role for advanced nuclear technologies in supporting critical infrastructure in California and of the potential for new, in-state nuclear powerplants to cost-effectively meet statewide needs for new electricity resources, and to meet the expressed policy of the state, pursuant to the 100 Percent Clean Energy Act of 2018 (Chapter 312 of the Statutes of 2018), to achieve 100 percent zero-carbon electricity by 2045.(b) In preparing the comprehensive assessment, the commission shall consider all of the following:(1) An analysis of system costs, reliability benefits, emission impacts, deployment timelines, waste management and disposal pathways to include advanced fuel cycle technologies, environmental and public health impacts, and potential siting considerations.(2) An evaluation assessing the potential of nuclear energy using high-renewable grid scenarios that require firm, dispatchable, zero-carbon resources to complement renewable resources, enhance grid reliability, and reduce overall system costs.(3) An assessment of the ratepayer, taxpayer, and private costs associated with spent nuclear fuel management, including onsite, interim, and long-term storage pathways, in comparison with systemwide costs of waste, storage, and byproduct management across other electricity generation technologies.(4) The potential for employment of a skilled and trained workforce, as defined for purposes of Sections 25536.7 and 25536.8 of the Health and Safety Code, in construction, operation, and maintenance of nuclear powerplants.(5) The potential need for procurement of electricity from nuclear powerplants after 2045.(6) The comparative outcomes relative to existing and projected energy pathways in California.(7) A comparative analysis of environmental, public health, and waste impacts across all electricity generation technologies.(8) Recommended revisions to state law and regulations, including to Sections 25524.1 and 25524.2.(9) An assessment of the security-related costs and considerations to store, handle, and transport nuclear fuel for each nuclear energy technology.(9)(10) Additional factors, as appropriate.(c) The commission shall consult with the Public Utilities Commission, the Independent System Operator, and other state agencies, as appropriate.(d) The commission shall hold workshops and solicit participation and comments from a broad range of stakeholders, including academic experts in nuclear science and technology and in public health, potential developers, investors, electric corporations, labor, ratepayer advocates, and environmentalists.(e) The commission may update the initial comprehensive assessment as appropriate.(f) The commission, the Public Utilities Commission, the Independent System Operator, and other public agencies may evaluate the potential of nuclear energy to meet long-term resource needs, notwithstanding the conditional prohibitions on siting new nuclear powerplants pursuant to Sections 25524.1 and 25524.2.